src/main/resources/org/apertium/transpiler/loki/apertium-eng.eng.dix.xml
<dictionary>
    <alphabet>ÀÁÂÄÆÇÈÉÊËÌÍÎÏÑÒÓÔÖÙÚÛÜàáâäçèéêëìíîïñòóôöùúûüABCDEFGHIJKLMNOPQRSTUVWXYZabcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwxyz</alphabet>
    <sdefs>
        <sdef n="n" 	c="Noun"/>
        <sdef n="sg" 	c="Singular"/>
        <sdef n="det" 	c="Determiner"/>
    </sdefs>
    <pardefs>

        <pardef n="the__det">
            <e>
                <p>
                    <l></l>
                    <r><s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="sp"/></r>
                </p>
            </e>
            <e r="RL">
                <p>
                    <l></l>
                    <r>
                        <s n="det"/>
                        <s n="def"/>
                        <s n="sg"/>
                    </r>
                </p>
            </e>
            <e r="RL">
                <p>
                    <l></l>
                    <r>
                        <s n="det"/>
                        <s n="def"/>
                        <s n="pl"/>
                    </r>
                </p>
            </e>
        </pardef>

    </pardefs>

    <section id="main" type="standard">


        <!-- SECTION: Determiners -->

        <e lm="the">
            <i>the</i>
            <par n="the__det"/>
        </e>


        <!-- SECTION: Nouns -->

        <e lm="a day's journey">
            <p>
                <l>a<b/>day's<b/>journey</l>
                <r>a<b/>day's<b/>journey<s n="n"/>
                    <s n="sg"/>
                </r>
            </p>
        </e>

    </section>

</dictionary>
